Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.220

Certified copies of decree—Department of natural resources duties.

The department of revenue shall be furnished two certified copies of the decree of the court distributing any real property to the state, one of which shall be forwarded to the department of natural resources which shall thereupon assume supervision of and jurisdiction over such real property and thereafter handle it the same as state common school lands. The administrator shall also file a certified copy of the decree with the auditor of any county in which the escheated real property is situated.

[ 1988 c 128 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 6; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.220. Prior: 1957 c 125 s 1; 1955 c 254 s 10.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.

Management of acquired lands by department of natural resources: RCW 79.10.030.